epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/tk.xml
		s1g
		.s2g
		s1h
		.s2h
		s1j
		.s2j
		s1k
		.s2k
		s1l
		.s2l
		s1m
		.s2m
		s1n
		.s2n
		s1p
		.s2p
		s1r
		.s2r
		s1s
		.s2s
		s1t
		.s2t
		s1w
		.s2w
		s1ý
		.s2ý
		s1z
		.s2z
		s1ň
		.s2ň
		s1ž
		.s2ž
		s1ş
		.s2ş
		t1b
		.t2b
		t1ç
		.t2ç
		t1d
		.t2d
		t1f
		.t2f
		t1g
		.t2g
		t1h
		.t2h
		t1j
		.t2j
		t1k
		.t2k
		t1l
		.t2l
		t1m
		.t2m
		t1n
		.t2n
		t1p
		.t2p
		t1r
		.t2r
		t1s
		.t2s
		t1t
		.t2t
		t1w
		.t2w
		t1ý
		.t2ý
		t1z
		.t2z
		t1ň
		.t2ň
		t1ž
		.t2ž
		t1ş
		.t2ş
		w1b
		.w2b
		w1ç
		.w2ç
		w1d
		.w2d
		w1f
		.w2f
		w1g
		.w2g
		w1h
		.w2h
		w1j
		.w2j
		w1k
		.w2k
		w1l
		.w2l
		w1m
		.w2m
		w1n
		.w2n
		w1p
		.w2p
		w1r
		.w2r
		w1s
		.w2s
		w1t
		.w2t
		w1w
		.w2w
		w1ý
		.w2ý
		w1z
		.w2z
		w1ň
		.w2ň
		w1ž
		.w2ž
		w1ş
		.w2ş
		ý1b
		.ý2b
		ý1ç
		.ý2ç
		ý1d
		.ý2d
		ý1f
		.ý2f
		ý1g
		.ý2g
		ý1h
		.ý2h
		ý1j
		.ý2j
		ý1k
		.ý2k
		ý1l
		.ý2l
		ý1m
		.ý2m
		ý1n
		.ý2n
		ý1p
		.ý2p
		ý1r
		.ý2r
		ý1s
		.ý2s
		ý1t
		.ý2t
		ý1w
		.ý2w
		ý1ý
		.ý2ý
		ý1z
		.ý2z
		ý1ň
		.ý2ň
		ý1ž
		.ý2ž
		ý1ş
		.ý2ş
		z1b
		.z2b
		z1ç
		.z2ç
		z1d
		.z2d
		z1f
		.z2f
		z1g
		.z2g
		z1h
		.z2h
		z1j
		.z2j
		z1k
		.z2k
		z1l
		.z2l
		z1m
		.z2m
		z1n
		.z2n
		z1p
		.z2p
		z1r
		.z2r
		z1s
		.z2s
		z1t
		.z2t
		z1w
		.z2w
		z1ý
		.z2ý
		z1z
		.z2z
		z1ň
		.z2ň
		z1ž
		.z2ž
		z1ş
		.z2ş
		ň1b
		.ň2b
		ň1ç
		.ň2ç
		ň1d
		.ň2d
		ň1f
		.ň2f
		ň1g
		.ň2g
		ň1h
		.ň2h
		ň1j
		.ň2j
		ň1k
		.ň2k
		ň1l
		.ň2l
		ň1m
		.ň2m
		ň1n
		.ň2n
		ň1p
		.ň2p
		ň1r
		.ň2r
		ň1s
		.ň2s
		ň1t
		.ň2t
		ň1w
		.ň2w
		ň1ý
		.ň2ý
		ň1z
		.ň2z
		ň1ň
		.ň2ň
		ň1ž
		.ň2ž
		ň1ş
		.ň2ş
		ž1b
		.ž2b
		ž1ç
		.ž2ç
		ž1d
		.ž2d
		ž1f
		.ž2f
		ž1g
		.ž2g
		ž1h
		.ž2h
		ž1j
		.ž2j
		ž1k
		.ž2k
		ž1l
		.ž2l
		ž1m
		.ž2m
		ž1n
		.ž2n
		ž1p
		.ž2p
		ž1r
		.ž2r
		ž1s
		.ž2s
		ž1t
		.ž2t
		ž1w
		.ž2w
		ž1ý
		.ž2ý
		ž1z
		.ž2z
		ž1ň
		.ž2ň
		ž1ž
		.ž2ž
		ž1ş
		.ž2ş
		ş1b
		.ş2b
		ş1ç
		.ş2ç
		ş1d
		.ş2d
		ş1f
		.ş2f
		ş1g
		.ş2g
		ş1h
		.ş2h
		ş1j
		.ş2j
		ş1k
		.ş2k
		ş1l
		.ş2l
		ş1m
		.ş2m
		ş1n
		.ş2n
		ş1p
		.ş2p
		ş1r
		.ş2r
		ş1s
		.ş2s
		ş1t
		.ş2t
		ş1w
		.ş2w
		ş1ý
		.ş2ý
		ş1z
		.ş2z
		ş1ň
		.ş2ň
		ş1ž
		.ş2ž
		ş1ş
		.ş2ş
		ý2t1b
		ý2n1b
		ý2d1b
		r2t1b
		ý2p1b
		l2p1b
		l2t1b
		g2t1b
		n2t1b
		r2k1b
		r2p1b
		k2t1b
		r2h1b
		s2t1b
		l2k1b
		w2p1b
		n2s1b
		r2s1b
		l2m1b
		ý2t1ç
		ý2n1ç
		ý2d1ç
		r2t1ç
		ý2p1ç
		l2p1ç
		l2t1ç
		g2t1ç
		n2t1ç
		r2k1ç
		r2p1ç
		k2t1ç
		r2h1ç
		s2t1ç
		l2k1ç
		w2p1ç
		n2s1ç
		r2s1ç
		l2m1ç
		ý2t1d
		ý2n1d
		ý2d1d
		r2t1d
		ý2p1d
		l2p1d
		l2t1d
		g2t1d
		n2t1d
		r2k1d
		r2p1d
		k2t1d
		r2h1d
		s2t1d
		l2k1d
		w2p1d
		n2s1d
		r2s1d
		l2m1d
		ý2t1g
		ý2n1g
		ý2d1g
		r2t1g
		ý2p1g
		l2p1g
		l2t1g
		g2t1g
		n2t1g
		r2k1g
		r2p1g
		k2t1g
		r2h1g
		s2t1g
		l2k1g
		w2p1g
		n2s1g
		r2s1g
		l2m1g
		ý2t1j
		ý2n1j
		ý2d1j
		r2t1j
		ý2p1j
		l2p1j
		l2t1j
		g2t1j
		n2t1j
		r2k1j
		r2p1j
		k2t1j
		r2h1j
		s2t1j
		l2k1j
		w2p1j
		n2s1j
		r2s1j
		l2m1j
		ý2t1k
		ý2n1k
		ý2d1k
		r2t1k
		ý2p1k
		l2p1k
		l2t1k
		g2t1k
		n2t1k
		r2k1k
		r2p1k
		k2t1k
		r2h1k
		s2t1k
		l2k1k
		w2p1k
		n2s1k
		r2s1k
		l2m1k
		ý2t1l
		ý2n1l
		ý2d1l
		r2t1l
		ý2p1l
		l2p1l
		l2t1l
		g2t1l
		n2t1l
		r2k1l
		r2p1l
		k2t1l
		r2h1l
		s2t1l
		l2k1l
		w2p1l
		n2s1l
		r2s1l
		l2m1l
		ý2t1m
		ý2n1m
		ý2d1m
		r2t1m
		ý2p1m
		l2p1m
		l2t1m
		g2t1m
		n2t1m
		r2k1m
		r2p1m
		k2t1m
		r2h1m
		s2t1m
		l2k1m
		w2p1m
		n2s1m
		r2s1m
		l2m1m
		ý2t1n
		ý2n1n
		ý2d1n
		r2t1n
		ý2p1n
		l2p1n
		l2t1n
		g2t1n
		n2t1n
		r2k1n
		r2p1n
		k2t1n
		r2h1n
		s2t1n
		l2k1n
		w2p1n
		n2s1n
		r2s1n
		l2m1n
		ý2t1p
		ý2n1p
		ý2d1p
		r2t1p
		ý2p1p
		l2p1p
		l2t1p
		g2t1p
		n2t1p
		r2k1p
		r2p1p
		k2t1p
		r2h1p
		s2t1p
		l2k1p
		w2p1p
		n2s1p
		r2s1p
		l2m1p
		ý2t1s
		ý2n1s
		ý2d1s
		r2t1s
		ý2p1s
		l2p1s
		l2t1s
		g2t1s
		n2t1s
		r2k1s
		r2p1s
		k2t1s
		r2h1s
		s2t1s
		l2k1s
		w2p1s
		n2s1s
		r2s1s
		l2m1s
		ý2t1t
		ý2n1t
		ý2d1t
		r2t1t
		ý2p1t
		l2p1t
		l2t1t
		g2t1t
		n2t1t
		r2k1t
		r2p1t
		k2t1t
		r2h1t
		s2t1t
		l2k1t
		w2p1t
		n2s1t
		r2s1t
		l2m1t
		ý2t1ý
		ý2n1ý
		ý2d1ý
		r2t1ý
		ý2p1ý
		l2p1ý
		l2t1ý
		g2t1ý
		n2t1ý
		r2k1ý
		r2p1ý
		k2t1ý
		r2h1ý
		s2t1ý
		l2k1ý
		w2p1ý
		n2s1ý
		r2s1ý
		l2m1ý
		ý2t1z
		ý2n1z
		ý2d1z
		r2t1z
		ý2p1z
		l2p1z
		l2t1z
		g2t1z
		n2t1z
		r2k1z
		r2p1z
		k2t1z
		r2h1z
		s2t1z
		l2k1z
		w2p1z
		n2s1z
		r2s1z
		l2m1z
		ý2t1ş
		ý2n1ş
		ý2d1ş
		r2t1ş
		ý2p1ş
		l2p1ş
		l2t1ş
		g2t1ş
		n2t1ş
		r2k1ş
		r2p1ş
		k2t1ş
		r2h1ş
		s2t1ş
		l2k1ş
		w2p1ş
		n2s1ş
		r2s1ş
		l2m1ş
		s2k1d
		l1s2k
		l1s2t
		s1t2r
		n2g1l
		n1g2r
		s2k1w
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
